Utah statutes.
16-15-105.   Filing of certificate -- Fees.
(1)  A business trust is registered when two copies of the certificate of
registration are filed with the division.  The documents to be filed shall be
true copies made by photographic, xerographic, electronic, or other process
that provides similar copy accuracy of a document that has been properly
executed.
(2)  The division shall endorse the original and one copy of a certificate of
registration and:
(a)  file the original in the division office; and
(b)  return the copy to the trustee or the trustee's representative.
(3)  The division may charge a fee in accordance with Section 63J-1-504 for
the filing.
